Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1263
Races and exhibitions; application; when; contents.

Whenever a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition is proposed to be held, the person in charge thereof shall, at least fifteen days prior thereto, file an application with the commission for permission to hold such regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition. The application shall set forth the date, time, and location where it is proposed to hold such regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament or exhibition, and it shall not be conducted without authorization of the commission in writing. The provisions of this section shall not exempt any person from compliance with applicable federal law or regulations.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 63.